Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.05, is amended to read: 299C.05 CRIME DATA COLLECTION. It shall be the duty of this division to collect, and preserve as a record of the bureau, information concerning the number and nature of offenses known to have been committed in the state, of the legal steps taken in connection therewith from the inception of the complaint to the final discharge of the defendant, and such other information as may be useful in the study of crime and the administration of justice. new text begin The information shall be provided in a form prescribed by the superintendent. new text end The information so collected and preserved shall include such data as may be requested by the United States Department of Justice, at Washington, under its national system of crime reporting. To the extent possible, the superintendent must utilize a nationally recognized system or standard approved by the Federal Bureau of Investigation to collect and preserve crime data. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.065, is amended to read: 299C.065 UNDERCOVER BUY FUND; WITNESS AND VICTIM PROTECTION. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Grantsdeleted text end new text begin Reimbursementsnew text end . The commissioner of public safety shall make deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementsnew text end to local officials for the following purposes: (1) the cooperative investigation of cross jurisdictional criminal activity relating to the possession and sale of controlled substances; (2) receiving or selling stolen goods; (3) participating in gambling activities in violation of section 609.76; (4) violations of section 609.322 or any other state or federal law prohibiting the recruitment, transportation, or use of juveniles for purposes of prostitution; (5) for partial reimbursement of local costs associated with unanticipated, intensive, long-term, multijurisdictional criminal investigations that exhaust available local resources, except that the commissioner may not reimburse the costs of a local investigation involving a child who is reported to be missing and endangered unless the law enforcement agency complies with section 299C.53 and the agency's own investigative policy; and (6) for partial reimbursement of local costs associated with criminal investigations into the activities of violent criminal gangs and gang members. Subd. 1a. Witness and victim protection fund. (a) A witness and victim protection fund is created under the administration of the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner may make deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementsnew text end to local officials to provide for the relocation or other protection of a victim, witness, or potential witness who is involved in a criminal prosecution and who the commissioner has reason to believe is or is likely to be the target of a violent crime or a violation of section 609.498 or 609.713, in connection with that prosecution. The awarding of deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementsnew text end under this subdivision is not limited to the crimes and investigations described in subdivision 1. (b) The commissioner may award deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementsnew text end for any of the following actions in connection with the protection of a witness or victim under this subdivision: (1) to provide suitable documents to enable the person to establish a new identity or otherwise protect the person; (2) to provide housing for the person; (3) to provide for the transportation of household furniture and other personal property to the person's new residence; (4) to provide the person with a payment to meet basic living expenses for a time period the commissioner deems necessary; (5) to assist the person in obtaining employment; and (6) to provide other services necessary to assist the person in becoming self-sustaining. Subd. 2. Application for deleted text begin grantdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementnew text end . A county sheriff or the chief administrative officer of a municipal police department may apply to the commissioner of public safety for a deleted text begin grantdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementnew text end for any of the purposes described in subdivision 1 or 1a, on forms and pursuant to procedures developed by the superintendent. For deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementsnew text end under subdivision 1, the application shall describe the type of intended criminal investigation, an estimate of the amount of money required, and any other information the superintendent deems necessary. Subd. 3. Investigation report. A report shall be made to the commissioner at the conclusion of an investigation for which a deleted text begin grantdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementnew text end was made under subdivision 1 stating (1) the number of persons arrested, (2) the nature of charges filed against them, (3) the nature and value of controlled substances or contraband purchased or seized, (4) the amount of money paid to informants during the investigation, and (5) a separate accounting of the amount of money spent for expenses, other than "buy money," of bureau and local law enforcement personnel during the investigation. The commissioner shall prepare and submit to the chairs of the committees in the senate and house of representatives with jurisdiction over criminal justice policy by January 1 of each even-numbered year a report of investigations receiving deleted text begin grantsdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementsnew text end under subdivision 1. Subd. 3a. Accounting report. The head of a law enforcement agency that receives a deleted text begin grantdeleted text end new text begin reimbursementnew text end under subdivision 1a shall file a report with the commissioner at the conclusion of the case detailing the specific purposes for which the money was spent. The commissioner shall prepare and submit to the chairs of the committees in the senate and house of representatives with jurisdiction over criminal justice policy by January 1 of each even-numbered year a summary report of witness assistance services provided under this section. Subd. 4. Data classification. An application to the commissioner for money is a confidential record. Information within investigative files that identifies or could reasonably be used to ascertain the identity of assisted witnesses, sources, or undercover investigators is a confidential record. A report at the conclusion of an investigation is a public record, except that information in a report pertaining to the identity or location of an assisted witness is private data. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.46, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Orders for protection; no contact orders; harassment restraining orders. (a) As used in this subdivision, "no contact orders" include orders issued as pretrial orders under section 629.72, subdivision 2, orders under section 629.75, and orders issued as probationary or sentencing orders at the time of disposition in a criminal domestic abuse case. (b) The data communications network must include orders for protection issued under section 518B.01new text begin or 609.2334new text end , harassment restraining orders, and no contact orders issued against adults and juveniles. A no contact order must be accompanied by a photograph of the offender for the purpose of enforcement of the order, if a photograph is available and verified by the court to be an image of the defendant. (c) Data from orders for protection, harassment restraining orders, or no contact orders and data entered by law enforcement to assist in the enforcement of those orders are classified as private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. Data about the offender can be shared with the victim for purposes of enforcement of the order. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 609.2334, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Copy to law enforcement agency; lead investigative agency. Within 24 hours of issuance of an order or continuance of an order under this section, the court administrator must forward the order for protection and any continuance of the order for protection to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the residence of the vulnerable adult and the lead investigative agency that received the report pursuant to subdivision 6. new text begin The court administrator shall make available to law enforcement officers in Minnesota, through a system of verification, information as to the existence and status of an order for protection issued under this section. new text end Section 518B.01, subdivision 13, deleted text begin appliesdeleted text end new text begin paragraphs (b) and (c), applynew text end to orders granted under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609A.015, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Bureau of Criminal Apprehension to identify eligible persons and grant expungement relief. (a) The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall identify any records that qualify for a grant of expungement relief pursuant to this subdivision or subdivision 1, 2, or 3. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall make an initial determination of eligibility within 30 days of the end of the applicable waiting period. If a record is not eligible for a grant of expungement at the time of the initial determination, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall make subsequent eligibility determinations annually until the record is eligible for a grant of expungement. (b) In making the determination under paragraph (a), the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall identify individuals who are the subject of relevant records through the use of fingerprints and thumbprints where fingerprints and thumbprints are available. Where fingerprints and thumbprints are not available, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall identify individuals through the use of the person's name and date of birth. Records containing the same name and date of birth shall be presumed to refer to the same individual unless other evidence establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, that they do not refer to the same individual. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension is not required to review any other evidence in making a determination. (c) The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall grant expungement relief to qualifying persons and seal its own records without requiring an application, petition, or motion. Records shall be sealed 60 days after notice is sent to the judicial branch pursuant to paragraph (e) unless an order of the judicial branch prohibits sealing the records or additional information establishes that the records are not eligible for expungement. (d) Nonpublic criminal records maintained by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension and subject to a grant of expungement relief shall display a notation stating "expungement relief granted pursuant to section 609A.015." (e) The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall inform the judicial branch of all cases for which expungement relief was granted pursuant to this section. Notification may be through electronic means and may be made in real time or in the form of a monthly report. Upon receipt of notice, the judicial branch shall seal all records relating to an arrest, indictment or information, trial, verdict, or dismissal and discharge for any case in which expungement relief was granted and shall issue any order deemed necessary to achieve this purpose. new text begin (f) If the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension subsequently determines that a sealed record did not qualify for expungement relief under this section, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall unseal the record and notify the judicial branch. Upon notification, the judicial branch shall unseal all records relating to an arrest, indictment or information, trial, verdict, or dismissal and discharge. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall make this determination based only on a record stored in its criminal history system. new text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall inform each law enforcement agency that its records may be affected by a grant of expungement relief. Notification may be through electronic means. Each notified law enforcement agency that receives a request to produce records shall first determine if the records were subject to a grant of expungement under this section. The law enforcement agency must not disclose records relating to an arrest, indictment or information, trial, verdict, or dismissal and discharge for any case in which expungement relief was granted and must maintain the data consistent with the classification in paragraph deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end . This paragraph does not apply to requests from a criminal justice agency as defined in section 609A.03, subdivision 7a, paragraph (f). deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Data on the person whose offense has been expunged under this subdivision, including any notice sent pursuant to paragraph deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end , are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end The prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim that an offense qualifies for automatic expungement under this section in the manner provided in section 611A.03, subdivisions 1 and 2. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j) new text end In any subsequent prosecution of a person granted expungement relief, the expunged criminal record may be pleaded and has the same effect as if the relief had not been granted. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension is directed to develop, modify, or update a system to provide criminal justice agencies with uniform statewide access to criminal records sealed by expungement. Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.12, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06121 299C.12 RECORD KEPT BY PEACE OFFICER; REPORT. Every peace officer shall keep or cause to be kept a permanent written record, in such form as the superintendent may prescribe, of all felonies reported to or discovered by the officer within the officer's jurisdiction and of all warrants of arrest for felonies and search warrants issued to the officer in relation to the commission of felonies, and shall make or cause to be made to the sheriff of the county and the bureau reports of all such crimes, upon such forms as the superintendent may prescribe, including a statement of the facts and a description of the offender, so far as known, the offender's method of operation, the action taken by the officer, and such other information as the superintendent may require.